dev/noun/noun.ne.dix
  <!-- स्थापना; स्थापना; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्थापना__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- युवा; युवा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="युवा__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कुरा; कुरा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कुरा__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विवाह; विवाह; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विवाह__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्बन्ध; सम्बन्ध; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्बन्ध__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- व्यवस्था; व्यवस्था; 1 -->
    <pardef n="व्यवस्था__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- समाज; समाज; 1 -->
    <pardef n="समाज__n_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जिल्ला; जिल्ला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जिल्ला__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साथी; साथी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साथी__n_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सामान; सामान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सामान__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्थान; स्थान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्थान__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पत्र; पत्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पत्र__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- डा; डा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="डा__n_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- केटी; केटी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="केटी__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ठाउँ; ठाउँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ठाउँ__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- किसान; किसान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="किसान__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- परिवर्तन; परिवर्तन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="परिवर्तन__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कार्यकर्ता; कार्यकर्ता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कार्यकर्ता__n_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संस्था; संस्था; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संस्था__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टोली; टोली; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टोली__n_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जीव; जीव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जीव__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रभाव; प्रभाव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रभाव__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अवस्था; अवस्था; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अवस्था__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कर्मचारी; कर्मचारी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कर्मचारी__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वस्तु; वस्तु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वस्तु__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- समय; समय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="समय__n_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मान्छे; मान्छे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मान्छे__n_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शब्द; शब्द; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शब्द__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पैसा; पैसा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पैसा__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दर्शन; दर्शन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दर्शन__n_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="स्थापना"><i>स्थापना</i><par n="स्थापना__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="युवा"><i>युवा</i><par n="युवा__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कुरा"><i>कुरा</i><par n="कुरा__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="विवाह"><i>विवाह</i><par n="विवाह__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्बन्ध"><i>सम्बन्ध</i><par n="सम्बन्ध__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="व्यवस्था"><i>व्यवस्था</i><par n="व्यवस्था__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="समाज"><i>समाज</i><par n="समाज__n_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="जिल्ला"><i>जिल्ला</i><par n="जिल्ला__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="साथी"><i>साथी</i><par n="साथी__n_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सामान"><i>सामान</i><par n="सामान__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="स्थान"><i>स्थान</i><par n="स्थान__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="पत्र"><i>पत्र</i><par n="पत्र__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="डा"><i>डा</i><par n="डा__n_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="केटी"><i>केटी</i><par n="केटी__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ठाउँ"><i>ठाउँ</i><par n="ठाउँ__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="किसान"><i>किसान</i><par n="किसान__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="परिवर्तन"><i>परिवर्तन</i><par n="परिवर्तन__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="कार्यकर्ता"><i>कार्यकर्ता</i><par n="कार्यकर्ता__n_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="संस्था"><i>संस्था</i><par n="संस्था__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="टोली"><i>टोली</i><par n="टोली__n_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="जीव"><i>जीव</i><par n="जीव__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रभाव"><i>प्रभाव</i><par n="प्रभाव__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="अवस्था"><i>अवस्था</i><par n="अवस्था__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="कर्मचारी"><i>कर्मचारी</i><par n="कर्मचारी__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="वस्तु"><i>वस्तु</i><par n="वस्तु__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="समय"><i>समय</i><par n="समय__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मान्छे"><i>मान्छे</i><par n="मान्छे__n_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शब्द"><i>शब्द</i><par n="शब्द__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="पैसा"><i>पैसा</i><par n="पैसा__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="दर्शन"><i>दर्शन</i><par n="दर्शन__n_nt_nn"/></e>
